Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General
§ 37-7-126.
Commissioners may borrow for unpaid construction or lawful debts; issuance of notes or bonds; interest specified.

The commissioners may borrow money, not exceeding the amount of “assessment for construction” as herein provided, unpaid at the time of borrowing for such purposes, or for the payment of any indebtedness that may have been lawfully incurred, and may secure the same by notes or bonds bearing interest at a rate not to exceed seven percent (7%) per annum and not running beyond one (1) year after the last installment of the assessment, on the account of which the money is borrowed, shall fall due, which said notes or bonds shall not be sold at less than ninety percent (90%) of their face value, which said bonds shall be transferable by delivery to the same extent as negotiable paper of the highest character; and may deliver notes or bonds to the United States to be held and when deemed desirable or when the appraised value of the land in the district is double the bonded indebtedness, sold by it, and the net proceeds received from the notes or bonds applied to the liquidation of contract indebtedness of the district, and said notes or bonds shall be in such form, terms and denominations as may be fixed by the court, but which notes or bonds shall not be held to make the commissioners personally liable, but shall constitute a lien upon the assessments for the repayment of the principal and interest of such notes or bonds. In case any moneys derived from bonds sold to pay for the construction, as herein provided, now or hereafter, remains on hand after such work is completed and paid for, and not raised for damages unpaid for, such residue may be used in the maintenance and repair, as in this chapter [§§

37-7-101

through

37-7-136

] provided, before making assessment for such maintenance and repair.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 26; R.S. 1931, § 87-126; C.S. 1945, § 62-126; W.S. 1957, § 37-97.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 37-7-127.
Refunding of indebtedness.

The court, may, upon the petition of the commissioners authorize them to refund any lawful indebtedness of the district now existing or which may hereafter be incurred by taking up and canceling all or any part of its outstanding notes and bonds, as fast as they come due or before, if the holders thereof will surrender the same and issue in lieu thereof new notes or bonds of such district, payable in such longer time as the court shall deem proper, in an amount sufficient to retire notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, together with such an amount as the commissioners of such district may deem necessary to provide for possible future defaults and delinquencies in the payment of assessments, and bearing interest not exceeding seven percent (7%) per annum. For the purpose of providing funds to pay such refunding bonds with interest thereon, the commissioners may levy assessments against the land in such district, but not in excess of the benefits assessed. In the alternative the commissioners may, if they deem it advisable, issue said refunding bonds in an amount sufficient only to retire all notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, and delinquencies in the payment of assessments levied, from year to year, assessments against the land in such district for such purposes, but not in excess of the benefits assessed against the same.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 27; R.S. 1931, § 87-127; C.S. 1945, § 62-127; W.S. 1957, § 37-98.

Cross references. —

See cross reference to §

37-7-126

.

§ 37-7-128.
Construction to be done by lowest responsible bidder; advertisement for bids; applicability of section.

In all cases where the work to be done at any one time under the directions of the commissioners will, in their opinion, cost to exceed twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), the same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the commissioners shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice published in some newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1) or more newspapers published elsewhere. If there be no newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly set forth the time and place when and where the bids advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids. This section shall not be construed to apply to the employment of superintendent, engineer, attorney or other employee engaged in the general work of the district.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 28; R.S. 1931, § 87-128; C.S. 1945, § 62-128; W.S. 1957, § 37-99.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 37-7-129.
Payment, tender or deposit of damages required before start of construction; exception.

The damages allowed to the owners of lands shall be paid or tendered before the commissioners shall be authorized to enter upon the lands for damage to which the award is made, for the construction of any power line or other work proposed thereon. If the owner is unknown or there shall be a contest in regard to the ownership of the lands, or the owner will not receive payment, or there exists a mortgage or other lien against the same, or the commissioners cannot for any other reason pay him, they may deposit the said damages with the clerk of the court, for the benefit of the owner, or parties interested, to be paid or distributed as the court shall direct, and such payment shall have the same effect as the tender to and acceptance of the damages awarded by the true owners of the land. This section shall not, however, prevent said commissioners, their agents, servants and employees, going upon said lands to do any and all work found necessary prior to making their assessment of benefits and award of damages, and the trial on their report thereof.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 29; R.S. 1931, § 87-129; C.S. 1945, § 62-129; W.S. 1957, § 37-100.

§ 37-7-130.
Assessments as lien against property.

Each and every sum assessed in any power district organized in the manner herein provided, as soon as such assessment is confirmed by the court, shall be and is declared to be a lien against the land so assessed, and unless some other method of collection is herein provided, it shall be collected in the same manner as any other money judgment, provided that whenever said assessment is a lien upon land it shall only be collected on said land on which it is a lien.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 30; R.S. 1931, § 87-130; C.S. 1945, § 62-130; W.S. 1957, § 37-101.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see §

1-17-101

et seq. and Rule 69, W.R.C.P.

§ 37-7-131.
Bonds not adversely affected by change in assessment.

No bonds or other money obligations issued by any power district shall be adversely affected by any subsequent change in assessment of benefits.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 31; R.S. 1931, § 87-131; C.S. 1945, § 62-131; W.S. 1957, § 37-102.

§ 37-7-132.
Commissioners declared public officers; acts presumed regular and valid; burden of proof on contestant.

Commissioners of power districts are hereby declared to be public officers. The presumption shall be in favor of the regularity and validity of all their official acts. Whenever any report of the commissioners of any power district or any part of any such report is contested, remonstrated against or called in question, the burden of proof shall rest upon the contestant, remonstrant or questioner.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 32; R.S. 1931, § 87-132; C.S. 1945, § 62-132; W.S. 1957, § 37-103.

§ 37-7-133.
Order confirming assessments as evidence of regularity.

The order confirming the assessments of benefits shall be conclusive as to the regularity of all proceedings relating to the assessments of benefits unless appealed from within thirty (30) days after the entry of such order.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 33; R.S. 1931, § 87-133; C.S. 1945, § 62-133; W.S. 1957, § 37-104.

§ 37-7-134.
Election of commissioners; date; term of office.

Upon the third Tuesday in November next preceding the expiration of terms of office of any power district commissioners appointed in any power district organized under the provisions of this chapter [§§

37-7-101

through

37-7-136

], there shall be elected three (3) commissioners for such power district, one (1) for the term of one (1) year, one (1) for the term of two (2) years, and one (1) for the term of three (3) years, and upon the third Tuesday in November of each year thereafter an election shall be held to elect a commissioner to succeed the outgoing commissioner whose term of office shall be for a period of three (3) years.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 34; R.S. 1931, § 87-134; C.S. 1945, § 62-134; W.S. 1957, § 37-105.

§ 37-7-135.
Election of commissioners; hour and place; notice; voters qualified; conduct; proxies; record required.

The commissioners of the district shall fix the hour and place within the boundaries of the district of each election and preside at the same. It shall be the duty of the commissioners at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of the election to mail to each person entitled to vote at his or her last known place of residence or business, a notice stating the time, place and purpose of such election. Every person owning or entitled by virtue of public land filing to the possession of land situated within and being a part of any district, in which an election is to be held, shall be entitled to cast one (1) vote for every one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) of assessed valuation of real property owned by him or her within said power district, or the major portion thereof, providing, that each person owning lands or entitled by virtue of public land filing to possession of land within said district shall be entitled to at least one (1) vote. At the hour and place of such election the commissioners shall call the roll of those entitled to vote and the number of votes each is entitled to. They shall make a record of the qualified voters present, receive all proxies, and prescribe the manner of canvassing votes. All proxies shall be in writing and signed by the person entitled to vote.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 35; R.S. 1931, § 87-135; C.S. 1945, § 62-135; W.S. 1957, § 37-106.

§ 37-7-136.
Election of commissioners; votes necessary to elect; filling of vacancies; qualifications and duties of commissioners elected.

No person shall be elected as commissioner who shall not have received a majority of all votes cast. No election shall be invalid by reason of the fact that a majority of the assessed valuation of real estate within the district was not represented at such election. Whenever the office of any elected commissioner shall become vacant by reason of death, resignation or other cause, the vacancy shall be filled by the surviving commissioners for the unexpired term. In case such vacancy is not filled within thirty (30) days the court shall fill such vacancy. All elected commissioners shall have the same qualifications and duties as herein prescribed for appointed commissioners.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 36; R.S. 1931, § 87-136; C.S. 1945, § 62-136; W.S. 1957, § 37-107.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of commissioners, see §

37-7-109

.